Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.010

Veterans' scoring criteria status in examinations.

In all competitive examinations, unless otherwise provided in this section, to determine the qualifications of applicants for public offices, positions, or employment, either the state, and all of its political subdivisions and all municipal corporations, or private companies or agencies contracted with by the state to give the competitive examinations shall give a scoring criteria status to all veterans as defined in RCW 41.04.007, by adding to the passing mark, grade or rating only, based upon a possible rating of one hundred points as perfect a percentage in accordance with the following:

(1) Ten percent to a veteran who served during a period of war or in an armed conflict as defined in RCW 41.04.005 and does not receive military retirement. The percentage shall be added to the passing mark, grade, or rating of competitive examinations until the veteran's first appointment. The percentage shall not be utilized in promotional examinations;

(2) Five percent to a veteran who did not serve during a period of war or in an armed conflict as defined in RCW 41.04.005 or is receiving military retirement. The percentage shall be added to the passing mark, grade, or rating of competitive examinations until the veteran's first appointment. The percentage shall not be utilized in promotional examinations;

(3) Five percent to a veteran who was called to active military service from employment with the state or any of its political subdivisions or municipal corporations. The percentage shall be added to promotional examinations until the first promotion only;

(4) All veterans' scoring criteria may be claimed:

(a) Upon release from active military service with a qualifying discharge as defined in RCW 73.04.005; or

(b) Upon receipt of a United States department of defense discharge document DD form 214, NGB form 22, or their equivalent or successor discharge paperwork, that characterizes his or her discharge as a qualifying discharge as defined in RCW 73.04.005.

[ 2024 c 146 s 14; 2017 c 97 s 2; 2013 c 83 s 1; 2009 c 248 s 1; 2007 c 449 s 1; 2003 c 45 s 1; 2002 c 292 s 4; 2000 c 140 s 1; 1974 ex.s. c 170 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 269 s 2; 1953 ex.s. c 9 s 1; 1949 c 134 s 1; 1947 c 119 s 1; 1945 c 189 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 9963-5.]

NOTES:

Intent—2024 c 146: See note following RCW 73.04.005.

Veterans and veterans' affairs: Title 73 RCW.